Washington statutes.
RCW 38.20.050

Small arms ranges.

Under the direction of the governor, the adjutant general shall, at the expense and in the name of the state, buy or lease, establish, equip, maintain and control such small arms ranges and issue such ammunition, transportation and supplies as may be necessary to provide each unit of the organized militia of Washington with adequate means and opportunity for thorough instruction in small arms practice.

[ 1989 c 19 s 35; 1943 c 130 s 91; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-91. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 120; 1909 c 134 s 92; 1895 c 108 s 168.]